Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-902
Tuition credit; conditions.

(1) In order to qualify for the tuition credit provided for in section 80-901, a member of the Active Selected Reserve shall have agreed to serve a minimum of three years in the reserve and pursue a course of study leading to a diploma, certificate, associate degree, baccalaureate degree, graduate degree, or professional degree.

(2) There shall be no lifetime limit on tuition credit for any qualifying member.

(3) Such entitlement shall not be granted to more than two hundred individuals in any calendar year.

Laws 1976, LB 266, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB4, § 2.